Washington statutes.
RCW 35.104.090

Liability.

(1) Members of the board, as well as other persons acting on behalf of the authority, while acting within the scope of their employment or agency, shall not be subject to personal liability resulting from their official duties conferred on them under this chapter.

(2) The state, the local government that created the authority, and the authority shall not be liable for any loss, damage, harm, or other consequences resulting directly or indirectly from grants provided by the authority or from programs, services, research, or other activities funded with such grants.

[ 2007 c 251 s 9.]

NOTES:

Captions not law—Severability—2007 c 251: See notes following RCW 35.104.010.